District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.18

Assistance with discovery.

A tribunal of the District may:

(1)

Request a tribunal outside the District to assist in obtaining discovery; and

(2)

Upon request, compel a person over which it has jurisdiction to respond to a discovery order issued by a tribunal outside the District.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 318, 63 DCR 222